Washington statutes.
RCW 26.60.090

Reciprocity.

A legal union, other than a marriage, of two persons that was validly formed in another jurisdiction, and that is substantially equivalent to a domestic partnership under this chapter, shall be recognized as a valid domestic partnership in this state and shall be treated the same as a domestic partnership registered in this state regardless of whether it bears the name domestic partnership.

[ 2012 c 3 s 12 (Referendum Measure No. 74, approved November 6, 2012); 2011 c 9 s 1; 2009 c 521 s 72; 2008 c 6 s 1101.]

NOTES:

Notice—2012 c 3: See note following RCW 26.04.010.